Hawaii statutes.
[§302D-23] Minimum educational data
reporting standards. The board shall establish educational reporting
standards that shall include minimum standards for reporting fiscal, personnel,
and student data, by means of electronic transfer of data files from charter
schools to the department. The minimum standards established by the board
shall include but not be limited to data required for the department, as the
state education agency, to meet all applicable federal reporting requirements.
[L 2012, c 130, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next